Tennessee, session 114, HB0752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-2-201(h)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "within thirty-six (36) months immediately".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0752
000896
- 1 -